pt-BR: Trilho padrão de montagem: Rabo de andorinha (9-11 mm); KeyMod; M-LOK; Picatinny; Zarelho para bandoleira; Weaver; Outros
nb: Standard skinnemontering: Svalehale (9–11 mm); KeyMod; M-LOK; Picatinny; Reimfeste; Weaver; Annet
hr-HR: Standardna montaža na šinu: Lastin rep (9 – 11 mm); KeyMod; M-LOK; Picatinny; Okretni zglob za remen; Weaver; Ostalo
bg-BG: Стандарт за монтажна релса: Лястовича опашка (9 – 11 mm); KeyMod; M-LOK; Пикатини; Антабка; Уивър; Други
zh-CN: 导轨安装标准: 燕尾槽（9–11 毫米）; KeyMod; M-LOK; 皮卡汀尼; 枪背带环; 韦弗; 其他
lt-LT: Bėgelio tvirtinimo standartas: Kregždės uodega (9–11 mm); KeyMod; M-LOK; Picatinny; Diržo suktukas; Weaver; Kita
pl: Standardowy montaż na szynie: Jaskółczy ogon (9–11 mm); KeyMod; M-LOK; Picatinny; Zaczep do zawieszenia; Weaver; Inne
el: Πρότυπη βάση στήριξης σε ράγα: Χελιδονοουρά (9–11 mm); KeyMod; M-LOK; Picatinny; Αορτηριούχος; Weaver; Άλλο
it: Standard di montaggio su ringhiera: A coda di rondine (9–11 mm); KeyMod; M-LOK; Picatinny; Maglietta per cinghia; Weaver; Altro
de: Standard der Schienenmontage: Schwalbenschwanz (9–11 mm); KeyMod; M-LOK; Picatinny; Riemenbügel; Weaver; Sonstige
en: Rail mount standard: Dovetail (9–11 mm); KeyMod; M-LOK; Picatinny; Sling swivel; Weaver; Other
pt-PT: Norma de montagem em trilhos: Rabo de andorinha (9–11 mm); KeyMod; M-LOK; Picatinny; Suporte para bandoleira; Weaver; Outro
sv: Monteringsstandard för skena: Laxstjärt (9–11 mm); KeyMod; M-LOK; Picatinny; Rembygelfäste; Weaver; Övrigt
ro-RO: Standard de montare pe șină: Coada rândunicii (9–11 mm); KeyMod; M-LOK; Picatinny; Inel de prindere curea; Weaver; Altele
fi: Kiskokiinnitysstandardi: Lohenpyrstö (9–11 mm); KeyMod; M-LOK; Picatinny; Hihnalenkki; Weaver; Muu
da: Standard for skinnemontering: Svalehale (9-11 mm); KeyMod; M-LOK; Picatinny; Rembøjle; Weaver; Andet
sk-SK: Štandardná montáž na držiak: Rybinová drážka (9–11 mm); KeyMod; M-LOK; Picatinny; Čap na popruh; Weaver; Iné
fr: Norme de fixation sur rail: Queue d’aronde (9-11 mm); KeyMod; M-LOK; Picatinny; Grenadière; Weaver; Autre
es: Estándar de montaje en riel: Cola de milano (9-11 mm); KeyMod; M-LOK; Picatinny; Anilla para correa; Weaver; Otro
th: มาตรฐานการติดตั้งราง: โดฟเทล (9–11 มม.); KeyMod; M-LOK; Picatinny; หูสลิง; Weaver; อื่นๆ
ja: レールマウント規格: ダブテール (9–11 mm); KeyMod; M-LOK; ピカティニー; スリングスイベル; ウィーバー; その他
tr: Ray montajı standardı: Kırlangıç kuyruğu (9-11 mm); KeyMod; M-LOK; Picatinny; Askı kayışı fırdöndüsü; Weaver; Diğer
hu: Sínszerelék szabványa: Fecskefarkas (9–11 mm); KeyMod; M-LOK; Picatinny; Szíjkarika; Weaver; Egyéb
zh-TW: 導軌安裝標準: 燕尾槽 (9–11 公釐); KeyMod; M-LOK; 皮卡汀尼; 槍背帶環; 韋弗式; 其他
cs: Standardní montáž na lištu: Rybinová drážka (9–11 mm); KeyMod; M-LOK; Picatinny; Oko na popruh; Weaver; Ostatní
ru: Стандарт крепления на планку: Ласточкин хвост (9–11 мм); KeyMod; M-LOK; Пикатинни; Антабка; Вивер; Другое
vi: Tiêu chuẩn gắn ray: Khớp đuôi én (9–11 mm); KeyMod; M-LOK; Picatinny; Khuy gắn dây đeo; Weaver; Khác
nl: Rail montagestandaard: Zwaluwstaart (9-11 mm); KeyMod; M-LOK; Picatinny; Sling swivel; Weaver; Overig
sl-SI: Standard montažne tirnice: Lastovičji rep (9–11 mm); KeyMod; M-LOK; Picatinny; Zaponka za jermen; Weaver; Drugo
ko: 레일 마운트 표준: 도브테일(9~11mm); KeyMod; M-LOK; 피카티니; 슬링 스위블; 위버; 기타